Massachusetts, session 194th, H2583.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
In order to promote uniformity and effectiveness statewide, be it enacted by the Senate
and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority of the same, as
follows:
SECTION 1. Section 168A of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 21, the words “departments of
probation” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service,
the departments of.
of 10

SECTION 2. Section 172 of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in lines 236-237, the words “office of the commissioner of probation” and inserting
in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
SECTION 3. Section 175 of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in lines 12-13, the words “office of the commissioner of probation” and inserting in
place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
SECTION 4. Section 175 of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out, in line 14, the words “such commissioner” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- the Massachusetts Probation Service.
SECTION 5. Section 178K of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in line 118, the words “department of probation” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
SECTION 6. Section 178K of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out, in line 277, the words “department of probation” and inserting in place thereof
the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
SECTION 7. Section 178K of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out, in line 288, the words “department of probation” and inserting in place thereof
the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
SECTION 8. Section 18N of chapter 6A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 29-30, the words “office of
probation” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
of 10

SECTION 9. Section 21 of chapter 22 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 3, the words “office of probation” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
SECTION 10. Section 21 of said chapter 22, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out, in line 18, the words “office of probation” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
SECTION 11. Section 5 of chapter 27 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 31, the words “board of probation”
and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
SECTION 12. Section 45 of chapter 30 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 12, the words “commissioner of
probation” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
SECTION 13. Section 45 of said chapter 30, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out, in lines 163-164, the words “commissioner of probation” and inserting in place
thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
SECTION 14. Section 45 of said chapter 30, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out, in lines 213-214, the words “commissioner of probation” and inserting in place
thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
SECTION 15. Section 76 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 9, the words “office of” and inserting
in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
of 10

SECTION 16. Section 76A of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in line 6, the words “office of” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
Massachusetts Probation Service.
SECTION 17. Section 24 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 234-235, the words “probation
department” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation
Service.
SECTION 18. Section 24 of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out, in line 468, the words “the department”.
SECTION 19. Section 61 of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in line 53, the words “department of probation” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
SECTION 20. Section 34 of chapter 94C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 45, the words “department of
probation” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
SECTION 21. Section 34 of said chapter 94C, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out, in line 49, the words “department of probation” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
SECTION 22. Section 129B of chapter 140 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2014 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 155-156, the words
of 10

“department of probation” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts
Probation Service.
SECTION 23. Section 5B of chapter 119A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 41-42, the words “office of the
commissioner of probation” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts
Probation Service.
SECTION 24. Section 131 of said chapter 140, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in lines 288-289, the words “department of probation” and inserting in place thereof
the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
SECTION 25. Section 131 of said chapter 140, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in lines 304-305, the words “department of probation” and inserting in
place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
SECTION 26. Section 34D of chapter 208 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 18-19, the words “office of the
commissioner of probation” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts
Probation Service.
SECTION 27. Section 32 of chapter 209 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 36, the words “office of the
commissioner of probation” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts
Probation Service.
of 10

SECTION 28. Section 5A of chapter 209A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 14, the words “office of the
commissioner of probation” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts
Probation Service.
SECTION 29. Section 7 of said chapter 209A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in line 137, the words “office of the commissioner of probation” and inserting in
place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
SECTION 30. Section 7 of said chapter 209A, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out, in lines 118-119, the words “department of probation” and inserting in place
thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
100 SECTION 31. Section 15 of chapter 209C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
101 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 36, the words “office of the
102 commissioner of probation” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts
103 Probation Service.
104 SECTION 32. Section 2A of chapter 211D of the General Laws, as appearing in the
105 2014 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 36, the words “office of the
106 commissioner of probation” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts
107 Probation Service.
108 SECTION 33. Section 2 of chapter 211F of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
109 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 2, the words “office of the
110 commissioner of probation” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts
111 Probation Service.
of 10

112 SECTION 34. Section 35A of chapter 218 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
113 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 18, the words “office of the
114 commissioner of probation” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts
115 Probation Service.
116 SECTION 35. Section 9 of chapter 258E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
117 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 22-23, the words “office of the
118 commissioner of probation” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts
119 Probation Service.
120 SECTION 36. Section 13B ¾ of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
121 2014 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 27, the words “of the
122 department”.
123 SECTION 37. Section 22C of said chapter 265, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
124 striking out, in line 29, the words “of the department”.
125 SECTION 38. Section 23B of said chapter 265, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
126 striking out, in line 26, the words “of the department”.
127 SECTION 39. Section 52 of said chapter 265, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
128 striking out, in line 16, the words “of the department”.
129 SECTION 40. The title of chapter 276 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
130 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out “Board of Probation” and inserting in place
131 thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
of 10

132 SECTION 41. Section 42 of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
133 striking out, in line 25, the words “board of”.
134 SECTION 42. Section 57 of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
135 striking out, in line 45, the words “board of”.
136 SECTION 43. Section 58 of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
137 striking out, in line 67, the words “board of”.
138 SECTION 44. Section 83 of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
139 striking out, in line 2, the words “office of the commissioner of probation” and inserting in place
140 thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
141 SECTION 45. Section 83 of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
142 by striking out, in line 14, the words “office of the commissioner of probation” and inserting in
143 place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
144 SECTION 46. Section 83 of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
145 by striking out, in lines 59-60, the words “office of the commissioner of probation” and inserting
146 in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
147 SECTION 47. Section 83 of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
148 by striking out, in lines 70-71, the words “office of the commissioner of probation” and inserting
149 in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
150 SECTION 48. Section 98 of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
151 striking out, in the section heading, the words “office of probation” and inserting in place thereof
152 the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
of 10

153 SECTION 49. Section 98 of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
154 by striking out, in line 1, the words “an office of probation” and inserting in place thereof the
155 following words:- the Massachusetts Probation Service.
156 SECTION 50. Section 98 of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
157 by striking out, in line 11, the words “office of probation” and inserting in place thereof the
158 following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
159 SECTION 51. Section 98 of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
160 by striking out, in line 12, the words “office of probation” and inserting in place thereof the
161 following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
162 SECTION 52. Section 98A of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
163 striking out, in line 3, the words “office of probation” and inserting in place thereof the following
164 words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
165 SECTION 53. Section 98A of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby further
166 amended by striking out, in lines 27-28, the words “office of probation” and inserting in place
167 thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
168 SECTION 54. Section 99 of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
169 striking out, in line 2, the words “probation service” and inserting in place thereof the following
170 words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
171 SECTION 55. Section 99F of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
172 striking out, in the section heading, the words “office of probation” and inserting in place thereof
173 the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
of 10

174 SECTION 56. Section 99F of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby further
175 amended by striking out, in line 2, the words “office of probation” and inserting in place thereof
176 the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
177 SECTION 57. Section 100A of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
178 striking out, in lines 2-3, the words “office of the commissioner of probation” and inserting in
179 place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
180 SECTION 58. Section 100B of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
181 striking out, in lines 2-3, the words “office of the commissioner of probation” and inserting in
182 place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
183 SECTION 59. Section 8 of chapter 276A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
184 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 1, the words “office of the
185 commissioner” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation
186 Service.
187 SECTION 60. Section 8 of said chapter 276A, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
188 by striking out, in lines 5-6, the words “office of the commissioner” and inserting in place
189 thereof the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
190 SECTION 61. Section 9 of said chapter 276A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
191 striking out, in lines 1-2, the words “office of the commissioner” and inserting in place thereof
192 the following words:- Massachusetts Probation Service.
of 10